Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.080

Judgments a lien on realty.

Judgments for fines in all criminal actions rendered, are, and may be made liens upon the real estate of the defendant in the same manner, and with like effect as judgments in civil actions.

[Code 1881 s 1111; RRS s 2188.]